Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB514.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 58 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3228. Brine.(a) Permission.--A municipality may spread brine produced from the drilling, alteration or operation of an oil or gas well which is not an unconventional well on roads within the municipality's boundaries for purposes of dust suppression or road stabilization. A municipality may designate another person to spread brine on the municipality's behalf only in a manner instructed by the municipality.(b) Authorization.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no State agency, including the department, may require authorization or approval from either the operator of a well or 1234567891011121314151617 a municipality for brine to be spread in accordance with subsection (a).(c) Distance restrictions.--Brine may not be spread within 150 feet of a stream, creek, lake or other body of water.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0514PN0496 - 2 - 12345